Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.526

Community college international student exchange program—Resident tuition for participants authorized.

The legislature intends to permit the governing boards of the community colleges to charge resident tuition and fees for students of foreign nations who are participants in the international student exchange program.

[ 1987 c 12 s 2.]